Utah statutes.
72-4-106.   State highways -- SR-6 to SR-10.

State highways include:

(1)  SR-6.  From the Utah-Nevada state line easterly through Delta and Tintic Junction to the northbound ramps of the North Santaquin Interchange of Route 15; then beginning again at the Moark Connection Interchange of Route 15 easterly through Spanish Fork Canyon and Price to Route 70 west of Green River.

(2)  SR-7.  From Route 15 in St. George easterly via Southern Parkway to  Airport Parkway.

(3)  SR-8.  From Dixie Downs Road to Route 18 in St. George on Sunset Boulevard.

(4)  SR-9.  From Route 15 at Harrisburg Junction easterly to Zion National Park south boundary, and from Zion National Park east boundary to Route 89 at Mt. Carmel Junction.

(5)  SR-10.  From a junction with Route 70 east of Fremont Junction northeasterly to Route 55 in Price.



Amended by Chapter 127, 2011 General Session

